Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201368-935
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the False Medicaid Claims Act:

(1) Attorney General means the Attorney General, the office
of the Attorney General, or a designee of the Attorney General;

(2) Claim means
any request or demand, whether under a contract or otherwise, for money or
property, and whether or not the state has title to the money or property,
that:

(a) Is presented to an officer, employee, or agent of the state;
or

(b) Is made to a contractor, grantee, or other recipient, if the
money or property is to be spent or used on the state's behalf or to advance
a state program or interest, and if the state:

(i) Provides or has provided
any portion of the money or property requested or demanded; or

(ii) Will reimburse
such contractor, grantee, or other recipient for any portion of the money
or property which is requested or demanded;

(3)
Good or service includes (a) any particular item, device, medical supply,
or service claimed to have been provided to a recipient and listed in an itemized
claim for payment and (b) any entry in the cost report, books of account,
or other documents supporting such good or service;

(4)(a) Knowing and knowingly means that a person, with respect
to information:

(i) Has actual knowledge of the information;

(ii) Acts in deliberate ignorance
of the truth or falsity of the information; or

(iii) Acts in reckless disregard
of the truth or falsity of the information.

(b) Acts committed
in a knowing manner or committed knowingly shall not require proof of a specific
intent to defraud;

(5) Material means having a natural tendency to influence or be
capable of influencing the payment or receipt of money or property;

(6) Obligation
means an established duty, whether or not fixed, arising from (a) an express
or implied contractual, grantor-grantee, or licensor-licensee relationship,
(b) a fee-based or similar relationship, (c) statute or rule or regulation,
or (d) the retention of any overpayment;

(7) Person means any body politic or corporate,
society, community, the public generally, individual, partnership, limited
liability company, joint-stock company, or association; and

(8) Recipient means an individual
who is eligible to receive goods or services for which payment may be made
under the medical assistance program.

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 68;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 68-1037.02;

Laws 2004, LB 1084, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,2004, § 68-1074;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 35;

Laws 2013, LB277, § 1.